District of Columbia statutes.
26-107

Restriction on use of words “bank” and “trust company”; violations.

(a)

No corporation, association, partnership, or individual shall carry on any business in the District of Columbia under any name or title containing the word “bank” or the words “trust company” unless:

(1)

The business is being carried on under the name or title on March 4, 1933;

(2)

The business is carried on under the supervision of the Comptroller of the Currency and the name or title is approved by the Comptroller of the Currency; or

(3)

The business is carried on under the supervision of the Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] and the name or title is approved by the Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions [Commissioner].

(b)

Any individual who, or corporation, association, or partnership which, violates any of the provisions of this section, and any officer of any such corporation or association and any officer or member of any such partnership, who assents to any such violation, shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than $5,000.

Mar. 4, 1933, 47 Stat. 1567, ch. 274, § 6
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 106(c)(2)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168
Apr. 30, 1988, D.C. Law 7-104, § 42, 35 DCR 147
1973 Ed., § 26-107.
1981 Ed., § 26-107.
This section is referenced in § 26-710.